District of Columbia statutes.
38-1411

Purpose.

It is the purpose of this subchapter to assist private nonprofit medical and dental schools in the District of Columbia in their critical financial needs in meeting the operational costs required to maintain quality medical and dental educational programs and to increase the number of students in such institutions as a necessary health manpower service to the metropolitan area of the District of Columbia.

Jan. 5, 1971, 84 Stat. 1934, Pub. L. 91-650, title III, § 302
1981 Ed., § 31-1711.
1973 Ed., § 31-921.